Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5814.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-1 of the General Laws entitled "Public Utilities Commission" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-1-64. Comprehensive study.
(a) The public utilities commission (PUC), in conjunction with the division of public
utilities and carriers (DPUC), shall produce a comprehensive study for the general assembly by
April 30, 2026 to be transmitted to the governor, speaker of the house and the senate president.
(b) There shall be an appropriation of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for the
hiring of consultants and experts to help research the study required in subsection (a) of this section.
(c)(1) The purpose of this study is to compile a holistic study with the sole intent of
ascertaining the best ways to lower all energy rates for the consumer including electric and gas.
Additionally, the study shall include an investigation of energy rates in other states and see what
they are doing, or not doing, to have energy rates lower than what rate payers are paying in Rhode
Island. Further, the study shall require the PUC and the DPUC to perform a comprehensive review
of all energy programs in Rhode Island that add to the cost of energy, and what programs, if
terminated, would reduce energy rates. The study shall be comprehensive and provide a detailed
review of Rhode Island energy policies and how we can learn from programs in other states.
(2) The PUC and the DPUC director shall formulate a research plan to conduct the study
and hire consultants to accomplish the study mission to find the best way to lower Rhode Island
energy costs by eliminating policies that add to the energy rates for taxpayers and any other Rhode

Island practices that are not transparent as to the added costs that increase energy bills. The PUC
shall make recommendations that any legislation that would affect energy costs have an energy
note similar to the financial fiscal notes that clearly and transparently show the positive or negative
effect the legislation will have on energy costs. Finally, this study shall empower the PUC and
DPUC to study any other areas pertinent to the goal of lowering rate payer energy costs.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002065
========
LC002065 - Page 2 of 3